Hawaii, session 2025, GM1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 23-75, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
" (c) This section shall apply to the following:
(1) Section 237-24.3(1)—Amounts received from loading,
transporting, and unloading agricultural commodities
shipped interisland;
(2) Section 237-24.3(3)(A)--Amounts received from cargo
loading or unloading;
(3) Section 237-24.3(3)(B)—Amounts received from tugboat
and towage services;
(4) Section 237-24.3(3) (C)—Amounts received from the
transportation of pilots or government officials and
other maritime-related services;
(5) Section 238-1, paragraph (7) of the definition of
"use"--The value of oceangoing vehicles for
transportation from one point to another in the State;
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiiiiliuliiniiiiiiu

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) Section 238-3(g)—The value of imported intoxicating
liquor and cigarettes and tobacco products for sale to
persons or common carriers in interstate commerce; ar^
[4^ Sect-ion 238-3 (h)---The value of vessels eonotructcd
under section 189-2-5-^—relating to ■ eommereial fishing
vessel loano>—prior—to July 1,—l-96-9n;—aftd
4-84-] (7) Section 237-28.1—Gross proceeds from
shipbuilding and ship repair."
SECTION 2. Section 23-77, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) This section shall apply to the following:
(1) Section 237-24.3(2)--Reimbursements to associations of
owners of condominium property regimes or nonprofit
homeowners or community associations for common
expenses;
[4-24- Seetioft—234—2-4-r-5—Tkmounts rcGcivcd by cxchangeo or
exchange memboro,*
43-)-] (2) Section 237-25 (a) (3)—Gross income received from
tangible personal property sales to state-chartered
credit unions;
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1369
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
[ (4-> ] (3) Section 237-24.8--7kinounts received by financial
institutions, trust companies, trust departments, or
financial corporations acting as interbank brokers;
[4^] (4) Section 237-26—Gross proceeds of scientific
contractors and subcontractors;
t4€)-] (5) Section [238—] 238-3 (i)—The value of
property or services exempted by section 237-26,
relating to scientific contracts; and
[4-7-}-] Section 237-27—Amounts received by petroleum
product refiners from other refiners."
SECTION 3. Section 23-79, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) This section shall apply to the following:
(1) Section 237-27.5—Gross proceeds from air pollution
control facility construction, reconstruction,
operation, use, maintenance, or furnishing;
(2) Section [S-3-8—34M-] 238-3 (j )—The value of air
pollution control facilities;
(3) Section 237-27.6—Amounts received by solid waste
processing, disposal, and electric generating facility
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO
iiiuiiiiiiiiBiiiiiniii

Page 4 H.B. NO 1369
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
operators under sale and leaseback transactions with
political subdivisions that involve the facilities;
(4) Section 237-29--Gross income of qualified persons or
firms or nonprofits or limited distribution mortgagors
for certified or approved low-income housing projects;
(5) Section [-2^6—3 (j ) ] 238-3 (i)—The value of property,
services, or contracting exempted by section 237-29,
relating to certified or approved housing projects;
(6) Section 431:7-208—Credit for low-income housing;
(7) Section 46-15.1 (a)--Gross income from county low-
income housing projects; and
(8) Section 346-369--Compensation received by provider
agencies for homeless services or homeless facility
management."
SECTION 4. Section 235-110.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) There shall be allowed to each taxpayer subject to
the tax imposed by this chapter a capital goods excise tax
credit, which shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net income
tax liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the taxable
year in which the credit is properly claimed.
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 4
miniiiimiiHHiiiiHH

Page 5 H.B. NO.
T,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
The amount of the tax credit shall be four per cent of the
cost of the eligible depreciable tangible personal property used
by the taxpayer in a trade or business and placed in service
within Hawaii after December 31, 2009.
In the case of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or
trust, the tax credit allowable is for eligible depreciable
tangible personal property that is placed in service by the
entity. The cost upon which the tax credit is computed shall be
determined at the entity level. Distribution and share of
credit shall be determined by rules.
In the case of eligible depreciable tangible personal
property for which a credit for sales or use taxes paid to
another state is allowable under section [238-3 (i),] 238-3 (h),
the amount of the tax credit allowed under this section shall
not exceed the amount of use tax actually paid under chapter 238
relating to the tangible personal property.
If a deduction is taken under section 179 (with respect to
election to expense certain depreciable business assets) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, no tax credit shall
be allowed for that portion of the cost of property for which
the deduction was taken."
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6 H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1
SECTION 5. Section 237-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
”(b) To the extent that any deduction, allocation, or
other method to determine tax liability is necessary to comply
with subsection (a), each taxpayer liable for the tax imposed by
this chapter shall be entitled to full offset for the amount of
legally imposed sales, gross receipts, or use taxes paid by the
taxpayer with respect to the imported property, service, or
contracting to another state and any subdivision thereof;
provided that such offset shall not exceed the amount of general
excise tax imposed under this chapter upon the gross proceeds of
sales or gross income from the sale and subsequent sale of the
imported property, service, or contracting. The amount of
legally imposed sales, gross receipts, or use taxes paid by the
taxpayer with respect to the import shall be first applied
against any use tax, as permitted under section [238-3 (i),] 238-
3(h), and any remaining amount may be applied under this section
for the same imported property, service, or contracting.
The director of taxation shall have the authority to
implement this offset by prescribing tax forms and instructions
that require tax reporting and payment by deduction, allocation.
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 6
iiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiHiiii

H.B. NO.
I I . . I V g
C.D. 1
or any other method to determine tax liability to the extent
necessary to comply with the foregoing.
The director of taxation may require the taxpayer to
produce the necessary receipts or vouchers indicating the
payment of the sales, gross receipts, or use taxes to another
state or subdivision as a condition for the allowance of this
offset."
SECTION 6. Section 237-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§237-24 Amounts not taxable. This chapter shall not
apply to the following amounts:
(1) Amounts received under life insurance policies and
contracts paid by reason of the death of the insured;
(2) Amounts received (other than amounts paid by reason of
death of the insured) under life insurance, endowment,
or annuity contracts, either during the term or at
maturity or upon surrender of the contract;
(3) Amounts received under any accident insurance or
health insurance policy or contract or under workers'
compensation acts or employers' liability acts, as
compensation for personal injuries, death, or
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 7
iiiiiiiiiHiiiniiiiiiii

Page 8 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
sickness, including also the amount of any damages or
other compensation received, whether as a result of
action or by private agreement between the parties on
account of the personal injuries, death, or sickness;
(4) The value of all property of every kind and sort
acquired by gift, bequest, or devise, and the value of
all property acquired by descent or inheritance;
(5) Amounts received by any person as compensatory damages
for any tort injury to the person, or to the person’s
character reputation, or received as compensatory
damages for any tort injury to or destruction of
property, whether as the result of action or by
private agreement between the parties (provided that
amounts received as punitive damages for tort injury
or breach of contract injury shall be included in
gross income);
(6) Amounts received as salaries or wages for services
rendered by an employee to an employer;
(7) Tkmounts received as alimony and other similar payments
and settlements;
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO
IHBimillllMfllllllHI

Page 9
H.B. NO.
"
h
C.D. 1
(8) 7\mounts collected by distributors as fuel taxes on
"liquid fuel" imposed by chapter 243, and the amounts
collected by such distributors as a fuel tax imposed
by any Act of the Congress of the United States;
(9) Taxes on liquor imposed by chapter 244D on dealers
holding permits under that chapter;
(10) The amounts of taxes on cigarettes and tobacco
products imposed by chapter 245 on wholesalers or
dealers holding licenses under that chapter and
selling the products at wholesale;
(11) Federal excise taxes imposed on articles sold at
retail and collected from the purchasers thereof and
paid to the federal government by the retailer;
(12) The amounts of federal taxes under chapter 37 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or similar federal taxes,
imposed on sugar manufactured in the State, paid by
the manufacturer to the federal government;
(13) An amount up to, but not in excess of, $2,000 a year
of gross income received by any blind, deaf, or
totally disabled person engaging, or continuing, in
any business, trade, activity, occupation, or calling
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 9
■iiiiiiiiiiiMiiiiiiiniiH

Page 10 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
within the State; a corporation all of whose
outstanding shares are owned by an individual or
individuals who are blind, deaf, or totally disabled;
a general, limited, or limited liability partnership,
all of whose partners are blind, deaf, or totally
disabled; or a limited liability company, all of whose
members are blind, deaf, or totally disabled;
(14) [Amounts] Prior to January 1, 2031, amounts received
by a producer of sugarcane from the manufacturer to
whom the producer sells the sugarcane, where:
(A) The producer is an independent cane farmer, so
classed by the Secretary of Agriculture under the
Sugar Act of 1948 (61 Stat, 922, chapter 519) as
the Act may be amended or supplemented;
(B) The value or gross proceeds of sale of the sugar,
and other products manufactured from the
sugarcane, is included in the measure of the tax
levied on the manufacturer under section
237-13(1) or (2);
(C) The producer's gross proceeds of sales are
dependent upon the actual value of the products
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 10
wilimfliiiiiiiiiiii

Page 11
H.B. NO. g;
C.D, 1
manufactured therefrom or the average value of
all similar products manufactured by the
manufacturer; and
(D) The producer's gross proceeds of sales are
reduced by reason of the tax on the value or sale
of the manufactured products;
(15) Money paid by the State or eleemosynary child-placing
organizations to foster parents for their care of
children in foster homes;
(16) Amounts received by a cooperative housing corporation
from its shareholders in reimbursement of funds paid
by such corporation for lease rental, real property
taxes, and other expenses of operating and maintaining
the cooperative land and improvements; provided that
such a cooperative corporation is a corporation:
(A) Having one and only one class of stock
outstanding;
(B) Each of the stockholders of which is entitled
solely by reason of the stockholder's ownership
of stock in the corporation, to occupy for
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 11
IHWMOIIliilimil

Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
dwelling purposes a house, or an apartment in a
building owned or leased by the corporation; and
(C) No stockholder of which is entitled (either
conditionally or unconditionally) to receive any
distribution not out of earnings and profits of
the corporation except in a complete or partial
liquidation of the corporation; and
(17) Amounts received by a contractor of the
Patient-Centered Community Care program that is
established by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs pursuant to title 38 United States
Code section 8153, as amended, for the actual costs or
advancements to third party health care providers
pursuant to a contract with the United States,"
SECTION 7. Section 238-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§23 8-3 Application of tax, etc. (a) The tax imposed by
this chapter shall not apply to any property, services, or
contracting or to any use of the property, services, or
contracting that cannot legally be so taxed under the
Constitution or laws of the United States, but only so long as,
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 1
IIBIIIimiHIIIIIMH

Page 13
H.B. NO. g'’
C.D. 1
and only to the extent to which the State is without power to
impose the tax.
To the extent that any exemption, exclusion, or
apportionment is necessary to comply with the preceding
sentence, the director of taxation shall:
(1) Exempt or exclude from the tax under this chapter,
property, services, or contracting or the use of
property, services, or contracting exempted under
chapter 237; or
(2) Apportion the gross value of services or contracting
sold to customers within the State by persons engaged
in business both within and without the State to
determine the value of that portion of the services or
contracting that is subject to taxation under chapter
237 for the purposes of section 237-21.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to any
use of property, services, or contracting the transfer of which
property, services, or contracting to, or the acquisition of
which by, the person so using the same, has actually been or
actually is taxed under chapter 237.
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 13
lilHIHIIIHIIHIin

Page 14 H.B. NO.
T,
h
C.D. 1
(c) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid only
once upon or in respect of the same property, services, or
contracting; provided that nothing in this chapter contained
shall be construed to exempt any property, services, or
contracting, or the use thereof from taxation under any other
law of the State.
(d) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be in addition
to any other taxes imposed by any other laws of the State,
except as otherwise specifically provided herein; provided that
if it be finally held by any court of competent jurisdiction,
that the tax imposed by this chapter may not legally be imposed
in addition to any other tax or taxes imposed by any other law
or laws with respect to the same property, services, or
contracting, or the use thereof, then this chapter shall be
deemed not to apply to the property, services, or contracting,
or the use thereof under such specific circumstances, but such
other laws shall be given full effect with respect to the
property, services, or contracting, or use.
(e) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to any
use of property exempted by section 238-4.
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 14
lllillllllllllllllHillill

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(f) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to any
use or consumption of aircraft and vessels, the transfer of
which aircraft or vessel to, or the acquisition of which by, the
person so using or consuming the same, or the rental for the use
of the aircraft or vessel, has actually been or actually is
taxed under chapter 237.
(g) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to any
intoxicating liquor as defined in chapter 244D and cigarettes
and tobacco products as defined in chapter 245, imported into
the State and sold to any person or common carrier in interstate
commerce, whether ocean-going or air, for consumption
out-of-state by the person, crew, or passengers on the shipper's
vessels or airplanes.
[4M-----The tax impeecd by thia chapter shall-not apply to
any use of vessels constructed un-de-r--acction 1-8-9-26 prior to
July 1,—1969.
-(- H-] (h) Each taxpayer liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter on property, services, or contracting shall be entitled
to full credit for the combined amount or amounts of legally
imposed sales or use taxes paid by the taxpayer with respect to
the same transaction and property, services, or contracting to
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 1
iiiHimiiiiiniiiiiiiH

Page 16 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
another state and any subdivision thereof, but the credit shall
not exceed the amount of the use tax imposed under this chapter
on account of the transaction and property, services, or
contracting. The director of taxation may require the taxpayer
to produce the necessary receipts or vouchers indicating the
payment of the sales or use tax to another state or subdivision
as a condition for the allowance of the credit.
[(j)] (i) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply
to any use of property, services, or contracting exempted by
section 237-26 or section 237-29.
[-Heh] (j) The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply
to any use of air pollution control facility exempted by section
237-27.5."
SECTION 8. Section 237-24.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["§237-24.5—Additional oxenytions-;---------------Ifit—addition to
the amount S' exempt under section 237-24-7—thio chapter shall- -not
•appiy-^fe©—afftoufttrs—received—by-!-
-Hr )- An exchange from;
- (A)- charged exchange members -by ■■the
exchange for;
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 1

Page 17 H.B. NO. faj
C.D. 1
-Hr)- The gale or purchase of 3ccuritic3 -or-
producto-y—or both,—bought or sold on—a-n
exchange--fey—exchange members for their ewft
account or an account for which they have
responsibility-as an agent,—broker,—on

- (444- ©rfeen—feeofe—exeeafeiens-^ftade-^er^-purpeaes—©4
effecting transactions;—and
- Hr44-)- -T-r-ade-y>roce3 3ing performed by an exchange in
matching trades,—kcypunehingy—raeand
keeping-/—post cashiering,—and notarization;
- (fife Membership dues,—fees,—charges/—aoscosmcnts,—and
feinas—from individuals or firms,—including
charges for firm symbols—(member identification),
■applfeaation processing/—rcg-iat-ration,—initiation,
membership transfers,—floor-or post privileges,
transaction time oxtenoions,—expediting
tranaaefeions-y—crossover trades—(trading out of
assigned functions)—and rule infractions;
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 17

Page 18 H.B. NO. ""
g
. . ■ -I V
C.D. 1
- {€>- Service feco charged to membero including fees
for commen-ieationo,—badges,—forma,—documenta,—and
repo-r-ta-^
- (©4- Listing fcca and Hating maintenance fees ■ charged
to—eempanica that wish to be liated and have
their securities or products traded on the
exchange;—and
Participation in the communication network
conaortium operated collectively by United-States
cxchangca or other marketa rccogniged-by—the
Sccuritiea and Exchange Commiaaion,—the
Commoditica Futurca Trading Commi-ae-i-on?—er
similar regulatory authoritica outoidc the—United
States that providea last aale -and-quete
seeeritiee-drftterfftatiefi—te—suheerdbere—er—that
connccta auch marketa or exchanges for purpoaca
of data tranamiaoion;
d3-)- Bxehaftge-afte«daere—by—reaeen—ef—exeeatiag^-a—aeearitiea
or product tranaaction on an exchange;—provided that
thia ■exemption ahall apply only to amounts received by
exchange membera from brokers or dcalcra regiatered
2025-3384 HB1369 GDI HMSO 1
IIIBIIHIIIIIIIIHIIIHI

Page 19 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
with the Sccuritieo and Exchange Gominissiony—from
futurca commission mcrchanta>—brokcra,—or aaaociatca
registered with the Commoditiea Futures Trading
Commiaaion,—or from similar individua-la or--£i-rm-3'
■registered with similar regulatory a^t-horitica outaidc
the United States;—and
4-34“ Exchange members as-^rccccds from the aal-e-of--their
exchange memberahipa.
-- As used in thia seet-ion-i
an—ex«daftge—©if—beard—e€—trade—as—defined
in 15 United Statea Code—aection 78c(a)(l)—or in 7 U-ni-feed Statca
Code acction 1,—rcapeetively,—which is aubjcct to regulatien by
the ScGuritica and Exchange Commisaion or—the Commoditiea
Futures Trading Commission or an organization subject to similar
regulation under the lows of a juriadiction outside the United
Statca-.-
"Exehangc member” means an individual or firm that ia
qualified by an exchange aa a member and pays membership"duoa to
an exchange in—order t-o—trade sccuritieo or produeta on an
exchange.
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 19

Page 20 H.B. NO. 1369
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Sccuritico'' mcang- securities ao defined in 15 United
Statco Code ocction 78c and "producto”-mcang contracts-of-oaic
of conunoditica for future delivery,—futurca contracts,—©ptiefts-r
calla,—puts-?—and aimilar righto ag defined in 7 United States
€©de—sceti-oft—2-7—which accuritlea or products are- permitted--to be
treded—©ft—an—eKcheege-^" ]
SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3384 HB1369 CDl HMSO 20

1369
H.B. NO
I
M
O
b
o
b
APPROVED this day of , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1369, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1369, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
247